Washington statutes.
RCW 11.98.012

Trust creation—Other jurisdictions.

A trust not created by will is validly created if its creation complies with the law of the jurisdiction in which the trust instrument was executed, or the law of the jurisdiction in which, at the time of creation or in the case of a revocable trust, at the time the trust became irrevocable:

(1) The trustor was domiciled, had a residence, or was a national;

(2) The trustee was domiciled or had a place of business; or

(3) Any trust property was located.

[ 2011 c 327 s 17.]

NOTES:

Application—Effective date—2011 c 327: See notes following RCW 11.103.020.